Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.16.090

Intoxication.

No act committed by a person while in a state of voluntary intoxication shall be deemed less criminal by reason of his or her condition, but whenever the actual existence of any particular mental state is a necessary element to constitute a particular species or degree of crime, the fact of his or her intoxication may be taken into consideration in determining such mental state.

[ 2011 c 336 s 355; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.16.090.]